Washington statutes.
RCW 26.12.172

Parenting seminars—Rules.

Any court rules adopted for the implementation of parenting seminars shall include the following provisions:

(1) In no case shall opposing parties be required to attend seminars together;

(2) Upon a showing of domestic violence or abuse which would not require mutual decision making pursuant to RCW 26.09.191, or that a parent's attendance at the seminar is not in the children's best interests, the court shall either:

(a) Waive the requirement of completion of the seminar; or

(b) Provide an alternative, voluntary parenting seminar for battered spouses or battered domestic partners; and

(3) The court may waive the seminar for good cause.

(4) Cases filed as a minor guardianship under chapter 11.130 RCW are exempt from requirements of parenting seminar attendance.

[ 2022 c 243 s 3; 2008 c 6 s 1046; 1994 c 267 s 5.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Effective date—1994 c 267: See note following RCW 26.09.191.